Illinois, session 104th, HB5756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Algorithmic Pricing Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds and declares:8        (1) Consumers increasingly purchase goods and services 9    through online platforms that collect and process browsing 10    behavior, geolocation data, purchase history, and other 11    personal data.12        (2) Businesses use automated systems and data-driven 13    algorithms to generate prices that may vary among 14    consumers for the same goods or services.15        (3) These practices, sometimes referred to as 16    "surveillance pricing", may limit a consumer's ability to 17    comparison-shop and may enable pricing based on a 18    consumer's perceived willingness to pay.19        (4) Transparency regarding the use of personal data in 20    pricing practices is necessary to promote fair dealing, 21    consumer protection, and market integrity. 22    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:  HB5756- 2 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1    "Algorithmic pricing" means a price for goods or services 2generated, in whole or in part, using an automated decision 3system, machine-learning model, or data-driven algorithm.4    "Baseline price" means the price for goods or services 5made available to consumers by a covered entity, excluding any 6discounts, coupons, promotional offers, limited-time sales, 7rebates, loyalty or club member pricing, or other reductions 8or incentives offered to the consumer that lower the total 9amount the consumer pays for the goods or services. "Baseline 10price" does not include a higher price for goods or services 11made available to consumers by a covered entity for the 12purpose of offering a lower price through surveillance pricing 13or algorithmic pricing. "Baseline price" does not include any 14additional fees for premium or additional features.15    "Clear and conspicuous" means a disclosure that is easily 16noticeable, understandable, and proximate to the pricing 17information presented to the consumer.18    "Covered entity" means any person or entity that sells or 19offers to sell goods or services through an online platform to 20consumers in this State.21    "Personal data" means information linked or reasonably 22linkable to a consumer, including, but not limited to, 23browsing history, search queries, geolocation data, prior 24purchases, digital identifiers, or demographic profile data.25    "Personalized price increase" means a price for goods or 26services that is higher than the baseline price and is set for   HB5756- 3 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1a consumer based on the consumer's personal data.2    "Surveillance pricing" means algorithmic pricing that uses 3a consumer's personal data to generate a personalized price 4increase. "Surveillance pricing" does not include any methods 5of lowering the baseline price for goods or services, 6including, but not limited to:7        (1) the application of any discounts, coupons, 8    promotional offers, rebates, limited-time sales, loyalty 9    or club member pricing, or other reductions or incentives 10    offered to the consumer that lower the total amount the 11    consumer pays;12        (2) price comparison tools, competitor price matching, 13    or other comparison-based pricing mechanisms; or14        (3) any other price reduction method that does not 15    increase the baseline price to the consumer. 16    Section 15. Mandatory disclosure of surveillance pricing.17    (a) A covered entity shall provide a clear and conspicuous 18disclosure if the baseline price for a specific consumer is 19personalized and generated using surveillance pricing. The 20disclosure must state: THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM 21USING YOUR PERSONAL DATA.22    (b) The disclosure required under subsection (a) shall be 23considered proximate to the pricing information if it is 24presented next to the price, at the point of checkout, or 25through a notice presented before completion of the   HB5756- 4 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1transaction. 2    Section 20. Consumer rights.3    (a) A consumer may opt out of surveillance pricing.4    (b) Upon request, a covered entity shall provide the 5consumer with a non-personalized baseline price for the goods 6or services. 7    Section 25. Prohibited conduct.8    (a) A covered entity shall not use the following 9information to generate algorithmic pricing:10        (1) race;11        (2) religion;12        (3) sexual orientation;13        (4) immigration status;14        (5) medical information; or15        (6) criminal history.16    (b) A covered entity shall not engage in deceptive or 17misleading personalized pricing practices.18    (c) A covered entity shall not inflate baseline prices or 19impose penalties on consumers who opt out of surveillance 20pricing under subsection (a) of Section 20. 21    Section 30. Exceptions.22    (a) This Act does not apply to price changes that are the 23result of:  HB5756- 5 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1        (1) fluctuations in the cost of acquiring, producing, 2    transporting, or distributing inventory, including, but 3    not limited to, changes in wholesale prices, manufacturing 4    costs, labor, insurance, or other input costs associated 5    with providing goods or services to different consumers;6        (2) objective cost differences directly related to the 7    provision, supply, or sale of goods or services to 8    consumers in different geographic areas, market regions, 9    or delivery locations, including, but not limited to, 10    reasonable variations reflecting the costs or conditions 11    associated with serving particular areas or responding to 12    differing levels of supply or demand;13        (3) supply chain disruptions, including, but not 14    limited to, delays, shortages, allocation by suppliers, 15    changes in shipping modes or routes, or other logistical 16    constraints that reasonably affect the seller's costs or 17    available quantities;18        (4) time-limited sales, promotions, or discounts that 19    are offered in good faith and in the usual course of the 20    seller's business, including introductory pricing, 21    seasonal or clearance sales, and advertised promotional 22    events;23        (5) the imposition, repeal, or adjustment of any tax, 24    fee, surcharge, or assessment imposed by federal, State, 25    or local law, or any pass-through of such amounts to the 26    consumer;  HB5756- 6 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1        (6) variations in shipping, delivery, or handling 2    costs, including fuel surcharges and carrier rate changes, 3    and any pass-through of such costs to the consumer;4        (7) loyalty, membership, or rewards programs, 5    including differentiated pricing based on participation in 6    the programs, use of digital coupons, or accumulation or 7    redemption of rewards, if the terms are disclosed and 8    applied in a non-discriminatory manner;9        (8) special discount programs, including 10    differentiated pricing offered to individuals who meet 11    publicly disclosed eligibility criteria, such as teachers, 12    employees, active-duty or retired military personnel, 13    senior citizens, and students;14        (9) any fees, surcharges, or other charges that are 15    imposed or set by third parties, including payment 16    processors, delivery platforms, or other intermediaries, 17    and any pass-through of such amounts to the consumer; or18        (10) any other bona fide price change that is 19    reasonably attributable to legitimate business 20    considerations, including changes in market demand, 21    competitive conditions, or the seller's cost structure, if 22    the price change is applied in a non-discriminatory manner 23    to similarly situated consumers.24    (b) This Act does not apply to algorithmic pricing models 25that do not use personal data, including models based on 26aggregate market demand.  HB5756- 7 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1    (c) This Act does not apply to: 2        (1) any insurer or affiliate of the insurer or any 3    artificial intelligence system, algorithmic pricing 4    system, or surveillance pricing system deployed by or on 5    behalf of an insurer or affiliate of the insurer; or6        (2) providers of financial services, including, but 7    not limited to, financial institutions, financial 8    institution affiliates, broker-dealers, registered 9    investment advisors, and entities that provide consumer 10    credit products, including credit cards, personal loans, 11    and mortgages.12    The provisions of paragraph (1) apply to any insurer or 13affiliate of the insurer that is regulated by the Department 14of Insurance. Nothing in the paragraph shall be construed to 15delegate regulatory oversight over any insurer or affiliate of 16an insurer to any State agency other than the Department of 17Insurance. 18    Section 35. Enforcement. A violation of any of the 19provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice under the 20Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 21remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 22General by that Act shall be available to him or her for the 23enforcement of this Act. 24    Section 40. Home rule. The regulation of algorithmic   HB5756- 8 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1pricing, surveillance pricing, or any other similar pricing 2mechanism is an exclusive power and function of the State. A 3home rule unit may not regulate algorithmic pricing, 4surveillance pricing, or any other similar pricing mechanism. 5This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 6functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 7the Illinois Constitution. 8    Section 45. Rulemaking. The Attorney General shall adopt 9rules to implement and administer this Act. 10    Section 50. Relation to other laws. Nothing in this Act 11shall be construed to limit any federal or State law. 12    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 13Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 14    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)15    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Algorithmic Pricing 16Transparency Act.17    (a) As used in this Section:18    "Covered entity" has the meaning set forth in the 19Algorithmic Pricing Transparency Act.20    "Expeditiously" has the same meaning set forth in 17 21U.S.C. 512. 22    (b) A covered entity that violates the Algorithmic Pricing   HB5756- 9 -LRB104 21634 SPS 37141 b1Transparency Act commits an unlawful practice within the 2meaning of this Act.3    (c) The provisions of Section 10a apply to a violation of 4the Algorithmic Pricing Transparency Act if a covered entity 5materially contributes to, induces, or otherwise facilitates a 6violation of the Algorithmic Pricing Transparency Act after 7having obtained actual knowledge that the covered entity is 8violating the Algorithmic Pricing Transparency Act. This 9subsection does not apply if the covered entity: (1) does not 10have actual knowledge that a price increase was set using 11surveillance pricing in violation of the Algorithmic Pricing 12Transparency Act; (2) in the absence of actual knowledge, does 13not willfully disregard facts or circumstances that would 14create actual knowledge; or (3) upon obtaining actual 15knowledge, facts or circumstances that would create actual 16knowledge, or written notification of claimed unauthorized 17activity, acts expeditiously to remove or disable access to 18the material that is the subject of infringing activity or, if 19the covered entity does not personally have the ability to 20remove or disable access to the price set, the covered entity 21acts expeditiously to notify the entity or person that has the 22ability to remove or disable access to the price. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 241, 2028.